Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-729
Judges; retired; assignment; when; retired judge, defined.

The Supreme Court of Nebraska is empowered, with the consent of the retired judge, (1) to assign judges of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, and district court who are now retired or who may be retired hereafter to (a) sit in any court in the state to relieve congested trial dockets or to prevent the trial docket of such court from becoming congested or (b) sit for the judge of any court who may be incapacitated or absent for any reason whatsoever and (2) to assign any judge of the separate juvenile court, county court, or Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court who is now retired or who may be retired hereafter to (a) sit in any court having the same jurisdiction as one in which any such judge may have previously served to relieve congested trial dockets or to prevent the trial docket of any such court from becoming congested or (b) sit for the judge of any such court who may be incapacitated or absent for any reason. Any judge who has retired on account of disability may not be so assigned.

For purposes of sections 24-729 to 24-733, retired judge shall include a judge who, before, on, or after March 31, 1993, has retired upon the attainment of age fifty-five and has elected to defer the commencement of his or her retirement annuity to a later date.

Laws 1974, LB 832, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 296, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 240, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 39;

Laws 1993, LB 363, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 5.

The Nebraska Constitution clearly permits district court judges, retired or not, to act as associate Supreme Court judges when necessary for prompt submission and determination of causes. ConAgra, Inc. v. Cargill, Inc., 223 Neb. 92, 388 N.W.2d 458 (1986).

This provision, which authorized the Supreme Court to assign retired district judges to sit in any court to relieve or prevent congested dockets, or to sit for a judge of any court who is incapacitated or absent, is not limited by article V, section 2, of the Nebraska Constitution, which expressly authorizes district judges to sit in specific cases. ConAgra, Inc. v. Cargill, Inc., 223 Neb. 92, 388 N.W.2d 458 (1986).